Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.902

Transfer of duties—Review and recommendation—2006 c 263.

The legislature encourages the members of the new state board of education to review the transfer of duties from the state board to other entities made in chapter 263, Laws of 2006 and if any of the duties that were transferred away from the state board are necessary for the board to accomplish the purpose set out in chapter 263, Laws of 2006 then the state board shall come back to the legislature to request those necessary duties to be returned to the state board of education. The state board of education is encouraged to make such a request by January 15, 2007.

[ 2006 c 263 s 101.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.